District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0730.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Business Licensing Reform and Accountancy Practice Emergency
Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Section 13(q) of the Advisory Neighborhood Commissions Act of 1975, effective
March 26, 1976 (D.C. Law 1-58; D.C. Official Code § 1-309.10(q)), is amended to read as
follows:
“(q)(1) Before granting or renewing a license for a theater, cinema, skating rink, dance
hall, exhibition, lecture, or other entertainment, the Department of Licensing and Consumer
Protection shall give 30-days notice by first-class mail or electronic mail to the affected
Commission. The notice shall contain the name of the applicant and a description, by street
number, or other plain designation, of the particular location for which the license is requested.
“(2) Pursuant to subsection (d) of this section, the Department of Licensing
and Consumer Protection shall give great weight to the Commission’s recommendations when
determining whether to grant or renew the license.”.
Sec. 3. Chapter 28 of Title 47 of the D.C. Official Code is amended as follows:
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(a) Subchapter I-A is amended as follows:
(1) The table of contents is amended by adding a new section designation to read
as follows:
“47-2851.25. Refund of erroneously paid fees.”.
(2) Section 47-2851.04 is amended as follows:
(A) Subsection (a) is amended as follows:
(i) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the period and inserting
the phrase “; and” in its place.
(ii) A new paragraph (3) is added to read as follows:
“(3) $198 for a 4-year license.”.
(B) Subsection (b) is amended as follows:
(i) Paragraph (1) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and
inserting a semicolon in its place.
(ii) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the period and inserting
the phrase “; and” in its place.
(iii) A new paragraph (3) is added to read as follows:
“(3) A 4-year license, a person shall pay a license fee of $198.”.
(C) A new subsection (h) is added to read as follows:
“(h)(1) A motor club or a business offering private tow services exclusively on behalf of
a motor club that applies
for a vehicular services license subject to this section shall not be required to
identify a towing service storage lot.
“(2) For the purposes of this subsection, the term:
“(A) “Motor club” means an entity that provides emergency roadside
service for members, and at least 2 of the following services:
“(i) Furnishing or procuring of reservations, discounts, monetary
exchange, and other travel-related services;
“(ii) Arranging for a loan or other advance of money to a member
in connection with providing any other motor club service;
“(iii) Furnishing insurance coverage to members under an
approved group or blanket policy, issued to the motor club by an authorized insurer;
“(iv) Payment for, or reimbursement of, a member for fees charged
by an attorney for services rendered to the member in defense of a traffic offense;
“(v) Assistance in locating, identifying, or recovering a stolen or
missing vehicle owned by a member; and
“(vi) Any other related service as determined by the Mayor
through rulemaking.
“(B) “Private tow” means the towing of a motor vehicle at the request of
the owner or authorized agent of the owner.”.
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(3) Section 47-2851.07(c) is amended to read as follows:
“(c) Licenses issued under this subchapter shall be valid for a period of 6 months, 2 years,
or 4 years.”.
(4) Section 47-2851.10(b)(3)(B) is amended by striking the phrase “months, but
less than 9 months, may” and inserting the phrase “month may” in its place.
(5) A new section 47-2851.25 is added to read as follows:
“§ 47-2851.25. Refund of erroneously paid fees.
“The Mayor may refund any license fee or tax, or portion thereof, that is erroneously paid
or collected pursuant to this chapter.”.
(b) Part A of Subchapter I-B is amended as follows:
(1) The table of contents is amended by striking the phrase “47-2853.49.
Substantial equivalency; practice privilege.” and inserting the phrase “47-2853.49. Practice
privilege.” in its place.
(2) Section 47-2853.42 is amended to read as follows:
“§ 47-2853.42. Eligibility requirements.
“(a) An applicant for licensure as a certified public accountant shall establish to the
satisfaction of the Board that the applicant:
“(l) Has passed an examination in accounting and auditing and such related
subjects as the Board shall determine to be appropriate;
“(2)(A) Holds a baccalaureate or post-baccalaureate degree with a concentration
in accounting conferred by a college or university acceptable to the Board or holds a degree the
Board determines to be substantially equivalent thereto; or.
“(B) Holds a baccalaureate degree conferred by a college or university
acceptable to the Board supplemented with the equivalent of an accounting concentration, which
may include related courses in other areas of business administration;
“(3) Has completed the following years of relevant experience:
“(A) Two years for an applicant who holds a baccalaureate degree
described in paragraph (2) of this subsection, of which one year may be substituted by having
completed an additional 30 semester credit hours above the minimum hours required for a
baccalaureate degree; or
“(B) One year for an applicant who holds a post-baccalaureate degree as
described in paragraph (2)(A) of this subsection; and
“(4) Meets any other requirements established by rule.
“(b)(1) For purposes of this section, the term “relevant experience” means providing
services or advice representing the skills needed at the time of licensure to serve the public as a
certified public accountant.
“(2) Relevant experience includes providing any type of business services or
advice using accounting, attest, compilation, management advisory, financial advisory, tax, or
consulting skills, to the extent such experience has been verified by a person licensed as a
3

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
certified public accountant.
“(3) Whether the experience of an applicant constitutes relevant experience shall
be determined by the Board.
“(c) The Mayor, pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure
Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), may
establish additional licensure requirements by rule to ensure that the applicant has the proper
training, experience, and qualifications to practice as a certified public accountant.”.
(3) Section 47-2853.49 is amended as follows:
(A) The section heading is amended to read as follows:
“§ 47-2853.49. Practice privilege.”.
(B) Subsections (a) and (b) are amended to read as follows:
“(a) An individual whose principal place of business is not in the District shall have all
the privileges of a licensee of the District without the need to obtain a license under § 47-
2853.42; provided, that the individual:
“(1) Holds a valid, unrestricted license as a certified public accountant (“CPA”) in
good standing issued by another state or territory of the United States; and
“(2) At the time of initial licensure in the other state or territory, the individual
was required to show evidence of having:
“(A) Passed the Uniform CPA Examination or another CPA examination
approved by the Board;
“(B) Satisfied education requirements equivalent to those set forth in § 47-
2853.42(a)(2); and
“(C) Satisfied experience requirements equivalent to those set forth in §
47-2853.42(a)(3).”.
“(b) An individual whose principal place of business is not in the District, who is licensed
as a CPA in good standing in another state or territory of the United States, and who had practice
privileges in the District under the version of this section that was in effect immediately prior to
the effective date of the Business Licensing Reform and Accountancy Practice Emergency
Amendment Act of 2026, passed on emergency basis on July 14, 2026 (Enrolled version of Bill
26-730), shall continue to have all privileges of a licensee in the District without the need to
obtain a license under § 47-2853.42 regardless of whether the individual meets the requirements
of this section on the effective date of such legislation.”.
(C) The lead-in language of subsection (d) is amended by striking the
phrase “shall simultaneously consent, as a condition of the grant of the privilege” and inserting
the phrase “shall be deemed to have simultaneously consented, as a condition of the exercise of
the privilege” in its place.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report for the Business
4

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Licensing Reform and Accountancy Practice Amendment Act of 2026, passed on 1st reading on
June 30, 2026 (Engrossed version of Bill 26-494), as the fiscal impact statement required by
section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved October 16, 2006 (120
Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect for no longer than
90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in section
412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788;
D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
5